Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4426
Bonds, contracts, and other obligations; consent and other proceedings not required.

(1) Bonds may be issued, contracts may be entered into, and other obligations may be incurred, under the Good Life District Economic Development Act without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or instrumentality of this state and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by the act, and the validity of and security for any bonds, contract, or other obligations shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any such consent or other proceedings, conditions, or things.

(2) No proceedings for the issuance of bonds, entering into contracts, or incurring of obligations of a city under the Good Life District Economic Development Act shall be required other than those required by the Good Life District Economic Development Act; and the provisions of all other laws and city charters, if any, relative to the terms and conditions for the issuance, incurrence, payment, redemption, registration, sale, or delivery of bonds, or entering into contracts, of public bodies, corporations, or political subdivisions of this state shall not be applicable to bonds, contracts, or other obligations issued or entered into pursuant to the Good Life District Economic Development Act.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 19.